Arkansas, session 2025, HB1138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-80-120(a)(1), concerning the signature
authority for advanced practice registered nurses and physician assistants,
is amended to read as follows:
(1) Certification of disability for patients to receive disabled
parking permits or placards from the Office of Motor Vehicle to the Office of
Motor Vehicle that a patient is a person with a disability for the purposes
of the Access to Parking for Persons with Disabilities Act, § 27-15-301 et
seq.; or

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 93, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
*JMB195*
01-30-2025 10:01:44 JMB195

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 HB1138
17-93-104. Certification for purposes of the Access to Parking for
Persons with Disabilities Act.
(a) A physical therapist licensed under this chapter is authorized to
certify to the Office of Motor Vehicle that a patient is a person with a
disability for the purposes of the Access to Parking for Persons with
Disabilities Act, § 27-15-301 et seq.
(b) This section does not expand the scope of practice of a physical
therapist.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 27-15-302(4), concerning the definition of
"person with a disability" within the Access to Parking for Persons with
Disabilities Act, is amended to read as follows:
(4) “Person with a disability” means any individual who, as determined
by a licensed physician certifying authority:
(A) Cannot walk one hundred feet (100′) without stopping to
rest;
(B) Cannot walk without the use of, or assistance from, a
brace, cane, crutch, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other
assistive device;
(C) Is restricted by lung disease to such an extent that
the person's forced respiratory expiratory volume for one (1) second, when
measured by spirometry, is less than one liter (1 L), or the arterial oxygen
tension is less than sixty millimeters of mercury (60 mmHg) on room air at
rest;
(D) Uses portable oxygen; or
(E) Has a cardiac condition to the extent that the
person's functional limitations are classified in severity as Class III or
Class IV according to standards set by the American Heart Association;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 27-15-302, concerning definitions within
the Access to Parking for Persons with Disabilities Act, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(8) "Certifying authority" means:
(A) A licensed physician;
(B) An advanced practice registered nurse as authorized
under § 17-80-120;
01-30-2025 10:01:44 JMB195

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 HB1138
(C) A physician assistant as authorized under § 17-80-120;
or
(D) A physical therapist as authorized under § 17-93-104.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 27-15-304(a)(1), concerning temporary
special certificates under the Access to Parking for Persons with
Disabilities Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) A person with a disability, which, as determined by a licensed
physician, is certifying authority to be temporary in nature as opposed to
permanent, may apply to the Office of Motor Vehicle for a temporary person-
with-a-disability special certificate, which may include a temporary van-
accessible parking decal, and, upon request, one (1) additional temporary
special certificate, which may include an additional van-accessible parking
decal.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 27-15-307(8)(B), concerning the
administration of the Access to Parking for Persons with Disabilities Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(B) Verify with a letter from a physician certifying
authority stating that the person for whom the van-accessible parking decal
is issued is a person with a disability that requires the use of a
wheelchair, a three-wheeled or four-wheeled scooter, a four-wheeled walker
with a seat, or a similar device that is commonly used to transport persons
who have limited or no use of their legs.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 27-15-308(a)(3)-(4), concerning the
eligibility for and renewal of a special license plate or certificate for a
person with a disability within the Access to Parking for Persons with
Disabilities Act, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A)(i) An owner of a motor vehicle that is issued a special
license plate under this section shall submit every four (4) years to the
Office of Motor Vehicle a physician recertification of the person with a
disability to be transported by the vehicle to continue to qualify for the
special license plate, unless the person with a disability has a permanent
disability The Office of Motor Vehicle shall require recertification of the
condition of the person with a disability by a certifying authority one (1)
01-30-2025 10:01:44 JMB195

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 HB1138
time every four (4) years.
(ii) Recertification shall not be required for a
disability that is permanent in nature.
(B) The photo identification card required in this
subsection must be renewed every four (4) years.
(4)(A) An organization that owns or leases a motor vehicle
described in § 27-15-303 that is used in the business of transporting persons
with disabilities may apply to the Office of Motor Vehicle for issuance of
one (1) special license plate to be affixed to the vehicle for each vehicle
used in the business.
(B) The requirements of a photo identification card and
physician recertification in this subsection recertification provisions of
subdivisions (a)(3)(A)-(B) of this section shall not apply to an applicant in
the business of transporting persons with disabilities as described in this
subsection.

/s/Torres



















01-30-2025 10:01:44 JMB195